foma/noun/Noun-C1.lexc
+noun+pl+gen+psp_keel_iruntu:^க்களின்கீழிருந்து #;
+noun+gen+psp_keele:^வின்கீழே #;
+noun+pl+gen+psp_keele:^க்களின்கீழே #;
+noun+gen+psp_keele_iruntu:^வின்கீழேயிருந்து #;
+noun+pl+gen+psp_keele_iruntu:^க்களின்கீழேயிருந்து #;
